


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Manage IT assets with Freshservice









































IT Asset Management Software
Maintain inventory of your IT and non-IT assets and track details throughout its lifecycle. Sign up for free
 











Try Freshservice free for 30 days







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 



















Get a free demo of Freshservice







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





No.of agents





Phone No.
















Everything you need to take control of your assets





CMDB


Asset Overview


Asset Mapping


















































Everything you need to take control of your assets


CMDB
View all the assets and contracts used by the organization in a single pane, and see details like its type, location, and the person or department using it.



Asset Overview
View all details of an asset’s lifecycle – from acquisition to expiry. Get context about its usage and plan future asset purchases.



Asset Mapping
Visualize dependencies and relationships with asset relationship map view.










Freshservice features to enhance your service delivery




Incident Management
Resolve tickets raised via email, self-service portal, phone, or in person. Track, prioritize, assign, and automate resolution processes to drive efficiency.





Service Catalog
Offer multiple services for various departments with the service catalog so users can place and receive requests in no time.





Knowledge Base
Create solutions for your incidents, automatically convert it to knowledge base articles, and improve productivity by responding to similar requests with canned responses.





Reporting
Identify bottlenecks, make informed decisions, monitor service desk performance, and improve service delivery with predefined and custom reporting capabilities.





Integrations
Make work simpler with popular third-party integrations and customizable plugins so you can manage services from the single window of your Freshservice account.





Gamification
Integrated game mechanics transforms the service desk to a game and makes work fun by motivating agents with rewards for tasks.




Sign up for freeRequest Demo 


The Freshservice impact on our customers
















““If another organization is frustrated with their current ITSM tool and wants a breath of fresh air, then Freshservice is there ready and waiting.””



          Adam Le Feuvre
        
Project Manager
M&C Saatchi



















“We’ve seen infinite improvements in our service desk with Freshservice. Being an evidence-based business, Freshservice helps us drive intelligent decisions by letting us track data.”



          Tom Peach-Geraghty
        
Head of IT Operations
Unidays



















“Freshservice has helped us improve our ability to serve to requests or queries in an elegant and professional manner. The portal experience is very good.”



          Karthikeyan Rammohan
        
Manager of People Operations
Flipkart



















“Veeva's teams are able to resolve issues in less than 4 hours with more visibility into end-users’ issues in Freshservice.”



          Prasad Ramakrishnan
        
Chief Information Officer
Veeva Systems



















“I was surprised at the speed of implementation, Freshservice was available the next day and ready to use in under a week.”



          Craig Bell
        
IT Service Director
Cordant





























Trusted by over 10,000 customers

















































































































Try Freshservice free for 30 days


Sign up with google
or




Please confirm your company and service desk domain ID








First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 































Cloud Service Desk Software  | Freshservice


















































Freshworks















Cloud Service Desk Software
Online IT solution better than On-premise
Seamlessly integrate and store everything on cloud
GET STARTED FOR FREE

 


Something better than On-premise software.. 
Wary of hosting servers and switching between multiple tools in different locations? You need something reliable to provide reliable data and automated workflows. Here is where cloud service desk software has filled a void. More and more enterprises have started opting for cloud based software over on-premise versions.








Why Choose Cloud service desk software over On-Premise

No or limited capital expenditure
Multiple locations with server on the cloud

Easy configuration and customization
Scalable and systematic workflow
Automated service desk
No worries about storage limits





Why you need Freshservice cloud service desk?
Freshservice SaaS helps you save you thousands of dollars which might be going down the drain with your current or almost non-existent help desk. 
Flexible cloud-based ITSM
Embed Freshservice’s one-touch service on your Android or iOS smartphone and use your cloud based service desk on the go. Add as many agents you require; assign tasks, monitor your agents and CI in just a few clicks. Get unlimited storage on the cloud with no hardware restrictions to boggle you down. 
Multichannel & Go mobile
Access and maintain your help desk from anywhere. You can use your SaaS service desk through different portals without any hiccups. You don’t have to rely on hosted servers or different integrations or applications to get your work running. You can even keep your data secure with periodic backups . 
Cost effective
Freshservice is cost effective, simple and efficient to use. You don’t have to invest in hosting, installing, configuration or any kind of infrastructure. Everything is available on the cloud. Save your valuable time and resources when you use Freshservice; eliminate all the unnecessary things your incompetent service desk makes you do.
Know more about Freshservice Service Desk Software


Need more reasons?? Check out Freshservice ITSM Features

IT Trouble Ticketing Software


IT Service Request Management Tool



IT Asset Management Software


IT Financial Management



ITIL Configuration Management


Service Desk Automation





Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds

Try Freshservice Now













Freshservice Integrations | Integrate your ITIL Service Desk with tools you are already using!









































Integrate with other apps you use and love
Freshservice fits right into your existing business ecosystem with integrations available for popular business apps. 
Sign up for free

 



Native Integrations














Atlassian JIRA

Map bugs to tasks and tickets from inside Freshservice

Learn more

















Rescue

Share users' screens instantly, and solve problems in real time

Learn more

















FreshBooks

Track time on tasks and tickets, plus get the option of invoicing

Learn more

















G Suite

Sign into your service desk directly from Google Apps with Single Sign On

Learn more

















Harvest

Time tracking and invoicing options in your service desk

Learn more

















SurveyMonkey

Enhance your customer support with meaningful feedback

Learn more

















Zapier

Easy to bridge the gap between your service desk and different applications

Learn more

















Dropbox

Send large files and attachments easily

Learn more

















Bomgar

Provide remote desktop assistance with screen-sharing and secure web-based live chat support

Learn more

















SCCM

Advanced asset discovery module to sync your inventories with the service desk 

Learn more

















Box

Share large files and documents from your service desk 

Learn more

















Amazon web services

Import virtual assets right from cloud storage EC2, RDS and EBS directly to your CMDB

Learn more

















Pagerduty

Incident management system to monitor, schedule and create alerts for all your tickets

Learn more

















Cloudwatch

Convert AWS CloudWatch alarms to tickets and alarm notifications to ticket notes

Learn more

















Quickbooks

Send time spent on tickets to QuickBooks for easy billing

Learn more

















ClearGraph

Interactive real-time reports with custom dashboards

Learn more

















DocuSign

Send contracts for online e-signature and approval from your service desk

Learn more

















Slack

Get alerts and resolve issues right from Slack channels

Learn more

















Office 365

Schedule and sync Freshservice events to your Office 365 Calendar

Learn more

















Salesforce

Import your Salesforce contact information straight into Freshservice

Learn more

















Yammer

Automatically convert your Yammer newsfeed into tickets within your service desk

Learn more

















WorkflowMax

Log time spent on your Freshservice tickets in your WorkflowMax jobs and tasks

Learn more

















Workday

Easily enter new data and create service requests to onboard new employees

Learn more









Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds
Start your 30-day free trial. No credit card required. No strings attached. 
Sign up for free

 
























Freshservice Pricing Plans | Enterprise ITSM Solution at $0









































Refreshing service management at $0
Enjoy free 30-day Estate trial and free forever on Sprout 




MONTHLY



Save upto 20%

YEARLY







SPROUT
For getting started




                    FREE
                


                      up to 3 agents and 100 assets
                    




100 End UsersIncident ManagementSelf-service PortalKnowledge BaseAsset ManagementAD Integration 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






BLOSSOM
Perfect for small teams




$
29



                      /agent/month billed
                        yearly
monthly



                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Sprout and…

Unlimited End UsersStandard ReportsMultiple Help Desk EmailsCustom Domain MappingTime Tracking  




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details








GARDEN
Ideal for growing teams




$
49



                      /agent/month billed
                        yearly
monthly



                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Blossom and…

Change, Problem, & Release ManagementMultiple SLAsPriority MatrixScheduled ReportsCustom Roles 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






ESTATE
Best value for large teams




$
79



                      /agent/month billed
                        yearly
monthly



                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Garden and…

Service CatalogEnterprise ReportsProject ManagementEnterprise Security - Custom SSL & Trusted IPContract Management 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details









24 x 7 email support and 24 x 5 phone support included with all plans
Can’t decide which plan is right for you? 
See our complete feature comparison












Day Passes
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Need extra support help for a product launch or other spike? Day Passes make it easy for you to add extra agents temporarily when you need them. Just add them as occasional agents, buy a few Day Passes, and let them use a day pass for each day they need to access your support.
Read more 









Frequently Asked Questions

How does the 30-day free trial work?After you sign up, you get free unrestricted access to all the features available in Freshservice for 30 days. Thereafter, you can upgrade to a suitable plan.Is my data safe?We take security seriously. Our servers are hosted in a world class data center that is protected by biometric locks and 24-hour surveillance. We ensure that our application is always up to date with the latest security patches. Our data center is EU-US privacy shield compliant and all Freshservice plans include SSL encryption to keep your data safe.Do you have any contracts or cancellation fees?No. We do not have contracts or cancellation fees. You can cancel whenever you want and you will only be billed for that particular month.What types of payment do you accept?We accept Visa, Mastercard, Discover, American Express, and also PayPal. For annual contracts, we accept checks and online transfers in USD, EUR, GBP currencies.Can I upgrade or downgrade anytime?Yes. Freshservice offers a pay-as-you-go service, and you can upgrade, downgrade or cancel at any time. To change your plan, visit 'Plans & Billing' in your Freshservice account.Do you offer any discounts?Yes. Freshservice offers discounts to non-profit organizations, educational institutions and large teams. Contact support@freshservice.com for personalized pricing. Who is an agent? Can I add an agent on short term basis?In Freshservice, an agent can either be full-time or occasional, depending on your requirement. A full-time agent is someone who is part of your core service desk team. An occasional agent is someone who requires access to the service desk only on need-to basis. By default, Freshservice offers 3 free Day Passes at the time of sign up. For adding more occasional agents, you can purchase Day Passes starting from $1. Anybody can be added as an occasional agent, and the admin can define their role and scope of access to the service desk portal.Can I buy features as add-ons? Only some features are available for purchase as add-ons at the moment. Contact support@freshservice.com about customized plans. Have any other questions?If you have questions about Freshservice or the sign up process, please email us at support@freshservice.com and we will be glad to answer all your questions. 






Get Freshservice for iOS and Android
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Freshservice's mobile apps have been thoughtfully designed to help your team stay in touch with users, even when they're not at their desks. With the iOS and Android apps, your team can stay on top of incoming tickets, collaborate with other agents, and respond to issues on the go.









































Ardevora
































































 





We take a 
second look... 







Reading betweenthe numbers 







Because 
no decision
is ever 
just rational
 



 







We are an investment team founded on the belief that making the most effective decisions for our clients means discerning both the reason and emotion behind the numbers.






Read about our
investment approach
Learn about
our funds












You are now leaving the Ardevora website and entering a website not operated by us.
						Ardevora provides links to external websites that you may find helpful,
						however the provision of this link does not constitute a recommendation or advice.
Ardevora accepts no responsibility for the accuracy or content of the website that
						you are about to access, or for any action that you take as a result of accessing this
						website.
Please ensure that you have read and understand the Terms and Conditions of such third
						party website and contact the operator of the site should you have any queries.
OK
GO BACK



























Ardevora Asset Management Llp Has Boosted Netease (NTES) Position By $989,000, Shorts at Tessco Technologies (TESS) Lowered By 32.2% - Money Making Articles Hot Stuff






 


















 





















 




































All News
Business
Tech

Tech
Finance
About
Contributors
Contacts




Today's Date:  Wednesday, July 26th, 2017
						

Welcome, visitor.   [  / Log in ]

							 

						





Ardevora Asset Management Llp Has Boosted Netease (NTES) Position By $989,000, Shorts at Tessco Technologies (TESS) Lowered By 32.2%


					
						July 21, 2017 - By Peter Erickson

Ardevora Asset Management Llp increased Netease Inc (NTES) stake by 3.73% reported in 2016Q4 SEC filing. Ardevora Asset Management Llp acquired 4,600 shares as Netease Inc (NTES)’s stock declined 3.53%. The Ardevora Asset Management Llp holds 127,800 shares with $27.52M value, up from 123,200 last quarter. Netease Inc now has $40.69B valuation. The stock declined 0.12% or $0.36 reaching $308.29 on the news. About 328,718 shares traded. NetEase Inc (ADR) (NASDAQ:NTES) has risen 77.85% since July 21, 2016 and is uptrending. It has outperformed by 61.15% the S&P500.







 Tessco Technologies Incorporated (NASDAQ:TESS) had a decrease of 32.2% in short interest. TESS’s SI was 8,000 shares in July as released by FINRA. Its down 32.2% from 11,800 shares previously. With 30,600 avg volume, 0 days are for Tessco Technologies Incorporated (NASDAQ:TESS)’s short sellers to cover TESS’s short positions. The SI to Tessco Technologies Incorporated’s float is 0.13%. About 7,832 shares traded. TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS) has risen 6.68% since July 21, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 10.02% the S&P500.
Investors sentiment decreased to 0.95 in 2016 Q4. Its down 0.76, from 1.71 in 2016Q3. It dropped, as 5 investors sold TESSCO Technologies, Inc. shares while 14 reduced holdings. 4 funds opened positions while 14 raised stakes. 4.90 million shares or 0.82% less from 4.94 million shares in 2016Q3 were reported. Ls Investment Advisors Ltd Liability Company has 0% invested in TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS). Tieton Capital Ltd Liability Corp owns 279,462 shares for 2.83% of their portfolio. Fmr Ltd Liability Corporation holds 0% or 544,564 shares in its portfolio. Blackrock Institutional Tru Na has invested 0% in TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS). Walleye Trading Limited Liability Com invested in 0% or 101 shares. Blackrock Fund has invested 0% in TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS). Wedge Cap Mgmt L Lp Nc stated it has 74,400 shares. California Pub Employees Retirement System reported 52,775 shares stake. Moors And Cabot Inc invested in 58,100 shares or 0.13% of the stock. 10,402 are owned by Goldman Sachs Gru Incorporated. Bridgeway Cap Mngmt invested 0.01% of its portfolio in TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS). Rbf Capital Ltd Liability accumulated 11,523 shares. Geode Capital Mngmt Limited Liability Corporation has invested 0% in TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS). Morgan Stanley owns 10,901 shares for 0% of their portfolio. Mufg Americas Hldg Corp holds 0% of its portfolio in TESSCO Technologies, Inc. (NASDAQ:TESS) for 247 shares.
TESSCO Technologies Incorporated architects and delivers the product and value chain solutions to organizations responsible for building, operating, maintaining and reselling cellular, mobile communications, wireless-fidelity , machine-to-machine, Internet of Things and wireless backhaul systems. The company has market cap of $121.69 million. The Firm provides marketing and sales services, knowledge and supply chain management, product-solution delivery and control systems utilizing Internet and information technology. It has a 58.86 P/E ratio.
Since May 22, 2017, it had 1 buy, and 0 selling transactions for $14,450 activity. 1,000 shares valued at $14,450 were bought by Wright Murray N on Monday, May 22.

 - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.







By Peter Erickson


  

 



 
 
Free Email Newsletter
Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:







  Recent Posts 

Jefferies Group Raised Xilinx (Call) (XLNX) Position By $7.61 Million; Dow Chemical Co (DOW) Had 9 Bullish Analysts


Ghost Tree Capital Cut Alexion Pharmaceuticals (ALXN) Position By $610,000; Last Week Chesapeake Utilities (CPK) Coverage


Ironsides Asset Advisors Lowered Mgm Resorts International (MGM) Position, Apogee Enterprises (APOG) Covered By 2 Bulls


Weiss Multi-Strategy Advisers Has Lowered By $2.63 Million Its Energy Tfr Partners LP (ETP) Position, Last Week Petroneft Resources PLC (LON:PTR) Analysts


Portolan Capital Management Lifted By $379,852 Its Wix .Com LTD  (WIX) Holding; Axiom International Investors Has Cut Its Starbucks (SBUX) Position


Vantage Investment Partners Has Lowered By $9.31 Million Its Cardinal Health (CAH) Position, Time Warner (TWX) SI Increased By 3.51%


Clearbridge Cut By $33.88 Million Its Discover Finl Svcs (DFS) Position, Axiom International Investors Has Lifted Its 8X8 New (EGHT) Holding


Srs Investment Management Decreased Servicenow (NOW) Stake; Digital Turbine (APPS) Had 3 Analysts Last Week


First Foundation Advisors Decreased Acuity Brands (AYI) Stake By $457,380, Rwc Asset Management Llp Trimmed Cme Group (CME) Position By $6.98 Million


Bb Biotech Ag Has Increased Intra (ITCI) Stake By $3.38 Million, T Mobile US (TMUS) Shorts Down By 9.94%


  








© Copyright 2016 MMAHotStuff - mmahotstuff.com - All Rights Reserved. -  About - Editorial - Contact














            	Get the Next Big Winner in your inbox Before the Bell



            
Lists*Consumer Eagle



>

	  

























Ardevora Asset Management LLP: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback



























ardevora asset management llp
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Investment Management
Ardevora Asset Management LLP operates as an investment management company. The Company offers asset management, equities, funds, investment strategies, financial planning, and advisory services. Ardevora Asset Management serves customers in the United Kingdom.




Corporate Information
Address:

6 New Bridge Street
London, EC4V 6AB
United Kingdom


Phone:
44-20-7842-0630


Fax:
44-20-7936-2598


Web url:
www.ardevora.com























From The Web











Key Executives


Jeremy David Lang


Partner/Co-Founder




William Thomas Pattisson


Partner/Co-Founder




Ben Fitchew


Partner




Hugh Rittner


Partner







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data


































﻿






























Ardevora Asset Management LLP Buys Shares of 187,900 Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Illinois Tool Works Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Illinois Tool Works Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

American Tower Corporation (REIT) (NYSE:AMT) Position Raised by Nisa Investment Advisors LLC
Exane Derivatives Acquires 2,244 Shares of ConocoPhillips (COP)
Broadcom Limited (AVGO) Given New $290.00 Price Target at Morgan Stanley

American National Registered Investment Advisor Inc. Has $565,000 Position in BB&T Corporation (BBT)
Ardevora Asset Management LLP Buys Shares of 187,900 Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW)
Analysts Set $2.88 Price Target for CytoDyn Inc (NASDAQ:CYDY)
Somewhat Favorable News Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect Blue Hills Bancorp (BHBK) Share Price
Lindblad Expeditions Holdings (LIND) Earns Daily News Sentiment Score of 0.11
NACCO Industries (NC) Getting Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Accern Reports
Head to Head Comparison: Saia (SAIA) & Werner Enterprises (NASDAQ:WERN)
Contrasting Global Brass and Copper Holdings (NYSE:BRSS) and Aqua Metals (AQMS)
MSA Safety Incorporporated (MSA) versus ADT Corp (ADT) Head-To-Head Contrast
Financial Survey: Sanderson Farms (SAFM) vs. Pilgrim’s Pride Corporation (PPC)
Investment Analysts’ Weekly Ratings Changes for Blancco Technology Group PLC (RGS)
BidaskClub Downgrades Wintrust Financial Corporation (NASDAQ:WTFC) to Sell
Valley National Bancorp (VLY) Downgraded by BidaskClub to Sell
United Bankshares, Inc. (NASDAQ:UBSI) Lowered to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub
Supreme Industries, Inc. (STS) Rating Lowered to Strong Sell at BidaskClub
Ramco-Gershenson Properties Trust (NYSE:RPT) Raised to “Buy” at BidaskClub







Ardevora Asset Management LLP Buys Shares of 187,900 Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW)


					Posted by Chloe McGuire on Jul 19th, 2017 // No Comments




Ardevora Asset Management LLP bought a new position in  Illinois Tool Works Inc. (NYSE:ITW) during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund bought 187,900 shares of the industrial products company’s stock, valued at approximately $26,917,000. Ardevora Asset Management LLP owned 0.05% of Illinois Tool Works at the end of the most recent reporting period. 
Other hedge funds and other institutional investors have also added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Pioneer Trust Bank N A OR raised its position in  Illinois Tool Works by 1.3% in the first quarter. Pioneer Trust Bank N A OR now owns 20,855 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $2,762,000 after buying an additional 275 shares during the period.  Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. raised its position in  Illinois Tool Works by 1.6% in the first quarter. Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. now owns 270,960 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $35,894,000 after buying an additional 4,367 shares during the period.  Moreno Evelyn V raised its position in  Illinois Tool Works by 14.4% in the first quarter. Moreno Evelyn V now owns 55,635 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $7,370,000 after buying an additional 7,000 shares during the period.  Woodstock Corp raised its position in  Illinois Tool Works by 0.8% in the first quarter. Woodstock Corp now owns 50,718 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $6,719,000 after buying an additional 385 shares during the period.  Finally, Franklin Street Advisors Inc. NC raised its position in  Illinois Tool Works by 2.3% in the first quarter. Franklin Street Advisors Inc. NC now owns 4,092 shares of the industrial products company’s stock worth $542,000 after buying an additional 92 shares during the period. 75.47% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 


 Get Illinois Tool Works Inc. alerts:



Shares of Illinois Tool Works Inc. (ITW) opened at 146.95 on Wednesday. The company has a 50-day moving average of $145.17 and a 200-day moving average of $135.35. Illinois Tool Works Inc. has a 12 month low of $111.50 and a 12 month high of $150.29. The stock has a market capitalization of $50.76 billion, a PE ratio of 24.69 and a beta of 1.12. 





Illinois Tool Works (NYSE:ITW) last announced its quarterly earnings data on Monday, April 24th. The industrial products company reported $1.54 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $1.45 by $0.09. The company had revenue of $3.47 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $3.40 billion. Illinois Tool Works had a net margin of 15.24% and a return on equity of 45.02%. The firm’s revenue for the quarter was up 6.0% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same period last year, the business earned $1.29 EPS.  On average, equities research analysts expect that  Illinois Tool Works Inc. will post $6.38 EPS for the current fiscal year. 
The business also recently disclosed a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Wednesday, July 12th. Shareholders of record on Friday, June 30th were issued a dividend of $0.65 per share. This represents a $2.60 annualized dividend and a yield of 1.77%. The ex-dividend date  was Wednesday, June 28th. Illinois Tool Works’s dividend payout ratio  is currently 43.70%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY WARNING: This news story was originally  reported by Chaffey Breeze and is the sole property of of Chaffey Breeze. If you are reading this news story on another domain, it was stolen and republished in violation of United States and international copyright & trademark laws. The correct version of this news story can be viewed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/19/ardevora-asset-management-llp-buys-shares-of-187900-illinois-tool-works-inc-itw.html. 
A number of brokerages have recently issued reports on ITW. Morgan Stanley  restated an “equal weight” rating and set a $140.00 price target (up previously from $136.00) on shares of Illinois Tool Works in a report on Monday, July 10th. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Illinois Tool Works from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $163.00 price target for the company in a report on Wednesday, July 12th. BidaskClub downgraded shares of Illinois Tool Works from a “strong-buy” rating to a “buy” rating in a report on Saturday, June 24th. Stifel Nicolaus  restated a “hold” rating and set a $147.00 price target on shares of Illinois Tool Works in a report on Friday, July 14th. Finally, Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) upgraded shares of Illinois Tool Works from a “sell” rating to a “buy” rating and raised their price target for the stock from $131.00 to $155.00 in a report on Thursday, June 1st. Six equities research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and eight have issued  a buy rating to the company. Illinois Tool Works currently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and a consensus price target of $148.69.
In other news, CEO Ernest Scott Santi sold 101,297 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, May 12th. The shares were sold at an average price of $138.03, for a total value of $13,982,024.91. Following the transaction, the chief executive officer now directly owns 191,142 shares in the company, valued at approximately $26,383,330.26. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is available at this link. Also, CFO Michael M. Larsen sold 52,447 shares of the firm’s stock in a transaction dated Friday, May 26th. The stock was sold at an average price of $140.62, for a total transaction of $7,375,097.14. Following the completion of the transaction, the chief financial officer now owns 67,383 shares in the company, valued at $9,475,397.46. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. Over the last three months, insiders have sold 220,850 shares of company stock valued at $30,945,971. 0.90% of the stock is owned by company insiders. 
About Illinois Tool Works
Illinois Tool Works Inc is a manufacturer of industrial products and equipment. The Company operates through seven segments. The Automotive OEM segment produces components and fasteners for automotive-related applications. The Food Equipment segment offers commercial food equipment. The Test & Measurement and Electronics segment produces test and measurement, and electronic manufacturing and maintenance, repair and operations (MRO) solutions.







Receive News & Ratings for Illinois Tool Works Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Illinois Tool Works Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 















































Ardevora Asset Management LLP: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 26, 2017 4:56 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Ardevora Asset Management LLP



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Ardevora Asset Management LLP is an employee owned hedge fund manager. The firm provides its services to pooled investment vehicles and pension and profit sharing plans. It manages separate client-focused equity portfolios. The firm also launches and manages equity mutual funds. It invests in the public equity and derivatives markets across the globe, with a focus on the United Kingdom. For its equity portfolios, the firm invests in stocks of companies with market capitalization greater than $1 billion. In the United Kingdom, the firm invests in companies with market capitalization greater than £250 million. It employs long only and long/short strategies to make its investments. Ardevora Ass...
Ardevora Asset Management LLP is an employee owned hedge fund manager. The firm provides its services to pooled investment vehicles and pension and profit sharing plans. It manages separate client-focused equity portfolios. The firm also launches and manages equity mutual funds. It invests in the public equity and derivatives markets across the globe, with a focus on the United Kingdom. For its equity portfolios, the firm invests in stocks of companies with market capitalization greater than $1 billion. In the United Kingdom, the firm invests in companies with market capitalization greater than £250 million. It employs long only and long/short strategies to make its investments. Ardevora Asset Management LLP was founded in 2010 and is based in London, United Kingdom.
Detailed Description


6 New Bridge StreetLondon,  EC4V 6ABUnited KingdomFounded in 2010



Phone: 44 20 7842 0630

Fax: 44 20 7936 2598

www.ardevora.com







Key Executives for Ardevora Asset Management LLP




Mr. Jeremy David Lang


      	Partner, Director, and Portfolio Manager
      


Age: 52
        







Mr. William Thomas Pattisson


      	Partner, Director, and Portfolio Manager
      


Age: 53
        







Mr. Benedict Wyndham Fitchew CFA


      	Partner and Portfolio Manager
      








Ms. Helen Rebecca Spear


      	Legal Counsel
      








Mr. Iain James Mather


      	Risk and Compliance Officer
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @sipp plc Europe 3i plc Europe A E Taylor Financial Services Limited Europe A-List Equity Research Limited Europe A. Anthony Corporate Limited Europe




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Ardevora Asset Management LLP, please visit www.ardevora.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close





































ARDEVORA ASSET MANAGEMENT LLP Institutional Portfolio - NASDAQ.com






























































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
	Quotes > 
	Ownership & Insider Trades > 
    Institutional Portfolio






ARDEVORA ASSET MANAGEMENT LLP






6 NEW BRIDGE STREET, LONDON,  , EC4V 6AB, (44207) 842-0641


Report Date: 06/30/2017

Position Statistics


Total Positions
130


New Positions
19


Increased Positions
89


Decreased Positions
41


Positions with Activity
130


Sold Out Positions
33


Total Mkt Value (in $ millions)
3,271



Institutional Holdings information is filed by major institutions on form 13-F with the Securities and Exchange Commission.



Sector Weighting



Energy
4.87%


Basic Materials
3.08%


Industrials
26.99%


Consumer Cyclicals
17.02%


Consumer Non-Cyclicals
3.02%


Financials
1.08%


Healthcare
12.39%


Technology
31.54%


Telecommunication Services



Utilities










Total Positions




New




Increased




Decreased




Activity




Sold Out






130 Positions as of 06/30/2017


Company

Class

Value of Shares ($1,000s) ▼

Change in Value ($1,000s)

Change (%)

Shares Held



ALIBABA GROUP HLDG LTD
SPONSORED ADS
51,278
1,873
3.79
336,782


MERCADOLIBRE INC
COM
47,948
47,948
New
169,800


BARD C R INC
COM
44,290
193
.44
137,500


ELECTRONIC ARTS INC
COM
43,096
478
1.12
378,867


NETEASE INC
SPONSORED ADR
42,457
2,866
7.24
136,300


NVIDIA CORP
COM
41,803
-10,002
(19.31)
251,600


SCRIPPS NETWORKS INTERACT INC
CL A COM
41,481
41,481
New
531,200


MONOLITHIC PWR SYS INC
COM
41,458
3,292
8.63
395,400


HEICO CORP NEW
COM
41,301
2,457
6.33
524,323


CINTAS CORP
COM
41,121
3,317
8.77
297,572


COGNEX CORP
COM
40,614
-3,558
(8.05)
428,100


IDEXX LABS INC
COM
40,571
-3,574
(8.1)
238,400


NAVISTAR INTL CORP NEW
COM
40,493
9,838
32.09
1,361,100


CELANESE CORP DEL
COM SER A
40,469
36,959
1,053.20
414,000


SANMINA CORPORATION
COM
40,395
40,395
New
951,600


QUEST DIAGNOSTICS INC
COM
40,252
36,651
1,017.93
367,800


TORO CO
COM
40,230
1,430
3.69
562,500


BROADRIDGE FINL SOLUTIONS INC
COM
39,883
3,617
9.97
524,843


EQUIFAX INC
COM
39,729
3,700
10.27
274,900


COMMVAULT SYSTEMS INC
COM
39,347
6,081
18.28
644,500




<< first< previous1234567next >last >>








Latest News Headlines




                            EXCLUSIVE-Banks dealing EU sovereign debt may be dragged out of London
                        



	                     4:33AM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Lonza outlines 2022 targets, shares hit record highs
                        



	                     4:26AM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            UK's Tullow Oil stays in red as weak oil prices drag down asset values
                        



	                     4:17AM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            One year after IPO, Japanese chat app Line reports drop in user numbers
                        



	                     4:16AM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Top EU court adviser says Coty can block retailers from online sales
                        



	                     4:14AM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines



































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX


































﻿





























Altfest L J & Co. Inc. Acquires Shares of 5,405 Vmware, Inc. (NYSE:VMW) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Vmware Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Vmware Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Altfest L J & Co. Inc. Acquires Shares of 5,405 Vmware, Inc. (NYSE:VMW)
Xerox Corporation (XRX) Stake Lowered by Altfest L J & Co. Inc.
Discover Financial Services (DFS) Shares Sold by Altfest L J & Co. Inc.
Altfest L J & Co. Inc. Acquires New Stake in Leidos Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:LDOS)
Hexavest Inc. Has $122,000 Stake in Physicians Realty Trust (NYSE:DOC)
Fox Run Management L.L.C. Invests $550,000 in ITT Inc. (NYSE:ITT)
W.W. Grainger, Inc. (NYSE:GWW) Shares Sold by Xact Kapitalforvaltning AB
Bank of Nova Scotia Sells 13,634 Shares of Cott Corporation (COT)
Cairn Energy PLC (LON:CNE) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by GMP Securities
Welltower Inc. (NYSE:HCN) Shares Bought by Liberty Capital Management Inc.
Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. Purchases 540 Shares of Prologis, Inc. (PLD)
The Blackstone Group L.P. (NYSE:BX) Shares Sold by BTR Capital Management Inc.
BTR Capital Management Inc. Cuts Stake in Cinemark Holdings Inc (NYSE:CNK)
Town & Country Bank & Trust CO dba First Bankers Trust CO Has $1.88 Million Stake in Vodafone Group PLC (VOD)
Central European Media Enterprises Ltd. (NASDAQ:CETV) Raised to Buy at BidaskClub
Fenimore Asset Management Inc. Boosts Position in CBIZ, Inc. (CBZ)
HSBC Holdings plc Reiterates “Hold” Rating for SOUTH32 LTD SPON  (SOUHY)
Carriage Services (CSV) versus StoneMor Partners L.P. (NYSE:STON) Critical Analysis
Analysts Set Cogeco Communications Inc (CCA) Price Target at $85.08
Persimmon plc (LON:PSN) Receives GBX 2,437.17 Consensus PT from Analysts







Altfest L J & Co. Inc. Acquires Shares of 5,405 Vmware, Inc. (NYSE:VMW)


					Posted by Oliver Carreras on Jul 24th, 2017 // No Comments




Altfest L J & Co. Inc. acquired a new stake in shares of  Vmware, Inc. (NYSE:VMW) during the second quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional investor  acquired 5,405 shares of the virtualization software provider’s stock, valued at approximately $473,000. 
Other institutional investors have also bought and sold shares of the company. Boston Advisors LLC acquired a new position in  Vmware during the first quarter valued at $14,209,000.  Wells Fargo & Company MN raised its position in  Vmware by 163.9% in the first quarter. Wells Fargo & Company MN now owns 1,612,242 shares of the virtualization software provider’s stock valued at $148,552,000 after buying an additional 1,001,289 shares during the period.  Ameriprise Financial Inc. raised its position in  Vmware by 34.1% in the first quarter. Ameriprise Financial Inc. now owns 103,084 shares of the virtualization software provider’s stock valued at $9,495,000 after buying an additional 26,199 shares during the period.  Forte Capital LLC ADV raised its position in  Vmware by 19.7% in the first quarter. Forte Capital LLC ADV now owns 19,595 shares of the virtualization software provider’s stock valued at $1,805,000 after buying an additional 3,220 shares during the period.  Finally, Fisher Asset Management LLC acquired a new position in  Vmware during the first quarter valued at $338,000. Institutional investors own  21.87% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Vmware Inc. alerts:



Shares of Vmware, Inc. (NYSE VMW) traded down 0.33% during trading on Monday, reaching $91.97. The company’s stock had a trading volume of 274,351 shares. The stock’s 50 day moving average price is $89.67 and its 200 day moving average price is $90.03. The company has a market cap of $37.56 billion, a PE ratio of 33.11 and a beta of 0.76. Vmware, Inc. has a 52 week low of $69.86 and a 52 week high of $98.00. 





Vmware (NYSE:VMW) last announced its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, June 1st. The virtualization software provider reported $0.99 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, topping analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.95 by $0.04. Vmware had a return on equity of 17.19% and a net margin of 17.36%. The company had revenue of $1.74 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $1.71 billion. During the same quarter in the prior year, the business posted $0.86 EPS. The business’s revenue was up 9.3% compared to the same quarter last year.  Equities research analysts predict that  Vmware, Inc. will post $4.93 EPS for the current year. 
WARNING: This piece was first  reported by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are reading this piece on another domain, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of United States and international copyright and trademark legislation. The correct version of this piece can be accessed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/24/altfest-l-j-co-inc-acquires-shares-of-5405-vmware-inc-nysevmw.html. 
Several equities analysts have recently weighed in on VMW shares. Drexel Hamilton  restated a “buy” rating and set a $105.00 price objective on shares of Vmware in a research report on Thursday, April 6th. MKM Partners  restated a “buy” rating and set a $110.00 price objective (up previously from $100.00) on shares of Vmware in a research report on Thursday, June 1st. Royal Bank Of Canada raised their price objective on shares of Vmware from $97.00 to $110.00 and gave the company an “outperform” rating in a research report on Wednesday, May 31st. Robert W. Baird upgraded shares of Vmware from a “neutral” rating to an “outperform” rating and raised their price objective for the company from $90.00 to $115.00 in a research report on Wednesday, May 31st. Finally, Zacks Investment Research lowered shares of Vmware from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Tuesday, May 30th. Seventeen research analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and twenty have issued  a buy rating to the company’s stock. The stock  has a consensus rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $96.67.
In other news, COO Rajiv Ramaswami sold 20,457 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Monday, July 10th. The stock was sold at an average price of $87.84, for a total transaction of $1,796,942.88. Following the sale, the chief operating officer now owns 313,721 shares in the company, valued at approximately $27,557,252.64. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which is available at the SEC website. Also, EVP Maurizio Carli sold 11,237 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Monday, June 5th. The stock was sold at an average price of $94.66, for a total value of $1,063,694.42. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. In the last quarter, insiders have sold 698,048 shares of company stock worth $62,259,433. Company insiders own  0.52% of the company’s stock. 
About Vmware
VMware, Inc is an information technology (IT) company. The Company is engaged in development and application of virtualization technologies with x86 server-based computing, separating application software from the underlying hardware. The Company offers various products, which allow organizations to manage IT resources across private clouds and multi-cloud, multi-device environments by leveraging synergies across three product categories: Software-Defined Data Center (SDDC), Hybrid Cloud Computing and End-User Computing (EUC).







Receive News & Ratings for Vmware Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Vmware Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 







































































Ardevora UK Income | Ardevora | Fund factsheets | FE Trustnet


















 

















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table











Home

»


Ardevora

»

Ardevora UK Income



Ardevora UK Income






Change Share Class?


Ardevora UK Income A

Ardevora UK Income B
Ardevora UK Income C
Ardevora UK Income D GBP



Select Performance Currency


Pound Sterling

Fund's Currency









Buy Fund
Add to Basket 
Factsheet PDF 
Group Factsheet
Classic Factsheet





More





 Close
Key Information


What is the Fund’s objective?
How has this fund performed?
Ratios and analysis
Prices
What does this fund invest in?
News and research about this fund
Contact Details




Options
Show group factsheets
Download factsheet PDF









Next steps
Buy this fund via Trustnet Direct
Add to Basket
Follow this fund on









Fund Centre
Performance
Dividends
Breakdown
Life & Pension Mirrors

                    History












            What is the Fund’s objective?


        The Ardevora UK Income Fund's investment objective is to achieve long-term capital appreciation and income.
    




How does FE rate this fund?







                        Jeremy Lang

                        William Pattisson










Not included in the AFI







Learn more about ratings 
Compare funds using ratings







Who manages this fund?









 Jeremy Lang

 Since 11-Jan-2011

                            Jeremy has worked with William Pattisson for much of his investment management career. He joined James Capel Fund...

                                    Co-manager








 William Pattisson

 Since 11-Jan-2011

                            William has worked with Jeremy Lang for much of his investment management career. He joined James Capel Fund Managers...

                                    Co-manager





Show all

Learn more about fund managers
Compare fund managers







Literature & Downloads




Provider's own Factsheet
Key Investor Information Document
Prospectus Supplement
Manager's Report - Final
Prospectus
Manager's Report - Interim




News and research related to this fund







Close X


                Current Managers:






 Jeremy Lang


Since 11-Jan-2011

                            Jeremy has worked with William Pattisson for much of his investment management career. He joined James Capel Fund Managers in 1986 where he and William managed North...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet






 William Pattisson


Since 11-Jan-2011

                            William has worked with Jeremy Lang for much of his investment management career. He joined James Capel Fund Managers in 1986 where he and Jeremy managed North American...

                                    Co-manager

View manager factsheet



                Previous Managers:

There is no previous managers for this fund











                        How has this fund performed?





Cumulative Performance chart










                                        3 Months

                                        6 Months

                                        1 Year

                                        3 Years

                                        5 Years





Cumulative Performance as at 25/07/2017



                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    3m
                                

                                    6m
                                

                                    1yr
                                

                                    3yrs
                                

                                    5yrs
                                






Ardevora UK Income A


                                    -1.6
                                

                                   +0.2
                                

                                    +1.3
                                

                                   +23.2
                                

                                   +93.8
                                






IA UK Equity Income


                                    +1.6
                                

                                   +7.5
                                

                                    +14.0
                                

                                   +25.7
                                

                                   +75.1
                                






Top performing funds


Create a custom chart of this fund's performance






Discrete Performance chart












 



                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    0- 12m
                                

                                    12m- 24m
                                

                                    24m- 36m
                                

                                    36m- 48m
                                

                                    48m- 60m
                                






Ardevora UK Income A


                                     +1.3
                                

                                   +7.2
                                

                                     +13.4
                                

                                      +8.1
                                

                                     +45.6
                                






IA UK Equity Income


                                     +14.0
                                

                                   +1.6
                                

                                     +8.5
                                

                                      +9.2
                                

                                     +27.7
                                






Check how your portfolios are currently performing


More performance charts













Forensic News Alerts




Forensic News Alerts





Get Fundswire alerts emailed to you











Ratios and Analysis


How does this fund compare against other funds in IA UK Equity Income?


Quartile Ranking





                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    1y
                                

                                    3y
                                



?


                                    Position
                                

                                    83 / 83
                                

                                    57 / 78
                                



?


                                    Quartile
                                

                                   4
                                

                                     3
                                



Ranking is for the main unit within the sector
View other funds in this sector


Other Rating




Morningstar AnalystRating










                            Ratio Info





                                     
                                

                                     
                                

                                    1y
                                

                                    3y
                                



?


                                    Volatility
                                

                                   9.87
                                

                                    9.35
                                



?


                                    Alpha
                                

                                      -10.37
                                

                                    -0.09
                                



?


                                    Beta
                                

                                      1.01
                                

                                     0.91
                                



?


                                    Sharpe
                                

                               0.38
                                

                                   0.36
                                



?


                                    Info Ratio
                                

                                    -1.83
                                

                                     -0.17
                                



?


                                    R2


                                    0.68
                                

                                    0.69
                                



?
                                    Quartiles:1
2
3

                                            4








                            Risk Score



                            FE Risk scores allow you to see how risky a fund is in comparison with the FTSE
                            100.




                                This fund:
                            

92




                                FTSE 100:
                            

100




                                Cash:
                            

0





Learn about FE Risk Scores






                            Investment Details





Charges 




                                    Initial
                                

                                    3.00%
                                



                                   Annual
                                

                                    1.25%
                                



?


                                    OCF
                                

                                     1.36%
                                



?


                                    Performance Fee
                                

                                0% 
                                  
                                 





                                    Minimum Investment?




                                    Initial
                                

                                    £ 5,000
                                



                                    Additional
                                

                                    £ 5,000
                                















Prices





                                     
                                

                                    Unit type
                                

                                    Currency
                                

                                    Bid
                                

                                    Offer
                                

                                    Date
                                

                                    Yield
                                

                                    Citicode
                                

                                    SEDOL
                                

                                    ISIN
                                



                                    Ardevora UK Income A
                                

                                    INC
                                

                                    GBP
                                

                                    1.49
                                

                                    25 Jul 2017
                                

                                    n/a
                                

                                    01BZ
                                

                                    B3TGCG9
                                

                                    IE00B3TGCG95
                                




Change the share class at the top of the page to see details of other share classes for this fund.









                        What does this fund invest in?




Asset Class Breakdown (31 May 2017)  






                                        Rank
                                    



                                        Asset 
                                    

                                        %  
                                    

                                         
                                    



                                        1
                                    




                                        UK Equities
                                    

                                        99.00
                                    







                                        2
                                    




                                        Money Market
                                    

                                        1.00
                                    




















































View Region and Sector breakdowns for this fund






Top Holdings (31 Mar 2017)






                                    Rank
                                

                                    Largest Holdings
                                

                                    %  
                                



                                    1
                                

ROYAL DUTCH SHELL


                                    7.11
                                



                                    2
                                

BP


                                    7.03
                                



                                    3
                                

GLAXOSMITHKLINE


                                    6.88
                                



                                    4
                                

NATIONAL GRID


                                    4.86
                                



                                    5
                                

DIAGEO


                                    4.69
                                



                                    6
                                

IMPERIAL BRANDS PLC


                                    4.67
                                



                                    7
                                

DIXONS CARPHONE PLC


                                    3.72
                                



                                    8
                                

WEIR GROUP


                                    2.47
                                



                                    9
                                

BRITISH AMERICAN TOBACCO


                                    2.44
                                



                                    10
                                

MICRO FOCUS INTERNATIONAL


                                    2.41
                                




More History













                        Additional Information




Additional Information






Legal Structure:


                                       OEIC
                                    



Own ISA wrapper:


                                        NO
                                          
                                    



Trustee / Depositary:


                                        Northern Trust Fiduciary Services (Ireland) Limited
                                    



Registrar:


                                        N/A
                                    



Multi-Manager:


                                       NO
                                    







Dividend policy:


 Jun 30 (Interim), Dec 31 (Final)




Fund size:


                                        £137.9m / $179.8m (25-Jul-17)
                                    



Unit Launch:


                                        11-Jan-2011
                                    



Fund Launch:


                                        11-Jan-2011
                                    







Savings plan:


                                        NO
                                    



Pricing times:


                                       12:00 Daily
                                    



Dealing times:


                                         Midday 
                                    



Dealing frequency:


                                       Daily
                                    









Other users also looked at










Related Funds




Funds with the same manager (Jeremy Lang)
Funds with the same manager (William Pattisson)
Funds in this Sector (IA UK Equity Income)
Funds in the same Region (United Kingdom)
Funds in the same Asset Class (Equity)














                        News and Research about this fund




Relevant articles





View all articles





Relevant Guides















Contact Details




 Ardevora Asset Management LLP, 6 New Bridge Street, London, EC4V 6AB
                               


www.ardevora.com

info@ardevora.com



+44 (0) 20 7842 0630 (Main Number)














Close X


                Historical FE Risk Score:




  Ardevora UK Income A

  FE
                Risk Score 92.00


Learn more about FE Risk Scores
View all FE Risk Scores







            
        All prices in Pence Sterling (GBX) unless otherwise specified. Price total return performance figures are calculated on a bid price to bid price basis (mid to mid for OEICs) with net income (dividends) reinvested. Performance figures are shown in Pound Sterling (GBP). You can switch the fund’s native currency using the currency selector towards the top of this page.
               
            





        Your custom layout changed and saved automatically

        Drag and drop the icon to customise your factsheet
        layout


Close X


                Email Friend:



                        Email Address:



                        Comment:



                         

                            Ok

                                Cancel





CLOSE


You are being transferred to Trustnet Direct, which is run by Financial Express Investments Limited (authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority), where you will be able to complete this transaction. Trustnet Direct is an execution-only service and does not provide advice on the suitability of investments. You should seek independent financial advice if you are unsure.
Proceed to Trustnet Direct








Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 






















                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and
                    Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com






























Ardevora Profile | FE Trustnet

















 



















Trustnet








Login


















To continue using this website, please tell us a  little about yourself:
 I am a financial adviser
 I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
 I am a financial paraplanner
 I work in financial services
 I am a private investor


   This site uses cookies.  Some of the cookies are essential for parts of the site to operate and have already been set.  
   You may delete and block all cookies from this site, but if you do, parts of the site may not work.  To find out more 
   about cookies on the website and how to delete cookies, see our Privacy and Cookie Policy.
   
 I accept the FE Trustnet cookie policy


Continue

For more information Click here






Investments

Unit Trusts & OEICs

Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


IA Unit Trusts & OEICs

IA Unit Trusts & OEICs Home
Prices & Performance
Multi-manager & Mixed Asset
Special Reports
IA UT&OEIC Ratings
A-Z Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Equities

Equities Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Equity Factsheets
Latest announcements


Investment Trusts

Investment Trusts Home
Prices & Performance
Investment Trust Ratings
A-Z Investment Trust Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Warrants
A-Z Sectors
Split Capital Analytics
Investment Trust Guide
Most viewed investment trusts
Most viewed groups


Pensions

Pensions Home
Prices & Performance
Pension Fund Ratings
A-Z Pension Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Pension Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Life

Life Home
Prices & Performance
A-Z Life Fund Ratings
A-Z Life Fund Factsheets
A-Z Life Group Factsheets
A-Z Life Product Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Life insurance glossary
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Offshore Funds

Offshore Funds Home
Prices & Performance
Offshore Fund Ratings
A-Z Offshore Fund Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
Offshore Funds Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


ETFs

ETFs Home
ETF Prices & Performance
ETF Fund Ratings
A-Z ETF Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
A-Z Sectors
ETFs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


VCTs

VCTs Home
VCT Prices & Performance
A-Z VCT Factsheets
VCTs Guide
Most viewed funds
Most viewed groups


Structured Products

Structured Products Home
A-Z Structured Product Factsheets
A-Z Group Factsheets
Structured products guide
Structured products glossary




Fund Managers

Fund Managers Home
Alpha managers
League table 
A-Z manager factsheets 


News & Research

News & Research Home
News Archive
Education guides

Education guides home
Emerging Market

ETFs
Unit Trust & OEIC

Investment trust


                                Offshore funds 
ISAs 


FE Trustnet Videos 
Bright-talk Videos 


Learning

Learn about investing
Investment basics

Pensions
Investing in a fund
Investment trusts
Exchange
                                Traded Funds (ETFs)
Passive funds
                                and trackers
What is an ISA?


What to invest in?

Bonds
Equities
Property
Commodities


Where to invest?

UK
US
Europe
Emerging markets
Asia


How to invest?


                                Setting objectives for your portfolio
Asset allocation
                                - the basics
Measuring performance

                                Onshore and offshore - what’s the difference


Fund ratings

About FE Ratings
FE Crown Fund Ratings
FE Passive Fund Ratings
FE Alpha Manager
                                Ratings
FE Risk Scores
The Adviser Fund
                                Index




Portfolio

Portfolio Home
Watchlist
Alerts


Tools

Home
Fundswire

Fundswire Home
Manage my alerts


Charting
Find an IFA
Pension Calculator
IFA tools

IFA tools home
FE AFI
Client Fund Profiler
Structured Products
Whitelabel Factsheets




Passive FundsNew

Passive Funds Homepage
Sectors

UK Equities
North American Equities
European Equities
Japanese Equities
Emerging Market Equities
UK Gilts
Property
Sterling Corporate Bonds
Index-Linked Gilts









Reading List




Clear all list



0


Your Basket


Aberdeen Global Indian Equity D2 GBP 





Open basket


















Login







Select Account..




Login
 Remember Me

Password Reminder
Not Registered? Click Here







Register





*

*

*



*


*

Choose a User Type
I am a financial adviser
I am a discretionary fund manager / multimanager
I am a financial paraplanner
I work in financial services
I am a private investor

*
 I accept your terms of use
 Send me FE Trustnet bulletins
Register





It's look like you're leaving us

            What would you like us to do with the funds you've selected
        
Show me all my options
        Forget them
        Save them 

            Remember my choice











        Customise this table














				Toolset

Portfolio
Multi-plotcharting
Fund ratings 
Top quartiles
Sector  performance
Indices
FE Adviser
					                fund index
WhiteLabel
					                factsheets
KIIDs 
					            download
Exchange
					                rates



















Fund Performance

IA Unit Trusts & OEICsEquity Price & PerformanceInvestment TrustsPension FundsLife FundsOffshore FundsETFsVenture Capital Trusts
















	                    You are here: 
				        

FE Trustnet


Offshore Funds


Group Factsheet











Investments


Group factsheet / Ardevora

Ardevora









 RSS Feed





Group overview
Group Performance




























5 Funds Managed


RankFundFocus 

1Ardevora Global EquityEquity

2Ardevora Global Long Only EquityEquity

3Ardevora Global Long Only Equity SRIEquity

4Ardevora UK EquityEquity

5Ardevora UK IncomeEquity














 








						Group details
					

						Fund types managed
					


 

						Ardevora
						Ardevora Asset Management LLP,6 New Bridge Street, London, EC4V 6AB
						+44 (0) 20 7842 0630 (Main Number)
www.ardevora.com
info@ardevora.com






 IA Unit Trusts & OEICs
											



 Offshore Funds

























Data provided by FE. Care has been taken to ensure that the information is correct, but FE neither warrants, represents nor guarantees the contents of information, nor does it accept any responsibility for errors, inaccuracies, omissions or any inconsistencies herein. Past performance does not predict future performance, it should not be the main or sole reason for making an investment decision. The value of investments and any income from them can fall as well as rise.



Login
Help
Contact Us









For Equity investors
FE Investegate
For Private investors
Trustnet Direct
For Professional investors
FE Invest
FE Analytics
FE Data feeds
FE Fund listings
For International investors
FE Trustnet Hong Kong
FE Trustnet Offshore
FE Trustnet Middle East


Quick links
Trustnet-Magazine
Investment research
FE Trustnet videos
Top rated funds
Top performing funds
Find a fund
Build a portfolio
The UK’s best fund managers
Performance charting
About us


Fund performance
IA unit trusts & OEICs
Equities
Investment trusts
Pension funds
Life funds
Offshore funds
ETFs
Venture capital trusts


Stay connected with FE Trustnet






Trustnet mobile website















LATEST :
Five reasons to keep hold of your defensive funds
13:00 | Monday, January 20, 2014






You are currently using an old browser which will not be supported by Trustnet after 31/07/2016.  To ensure you benefit from all features on the site, please update your browser.   Close 














                © Trustnet Limited 2017. All Rights Reserved.
                Please read our 
                    Terms of Use / Disclaimer and Privacy and Cookie Policy.
                Data supplied in conjunction with Thomson Financial Limited, London Stock Exchange
                Plc, StructuredRetailProducts.com and ManorPark.com
            
        






















 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Manage IT assets with Freshservice









































IT Asset Management Software
Maintain inventory of your IT and non-IT assets and track details throughout its lifecycle. Sign up for free
 











Try Freshservice free for 30 days







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 



















Get a free demo of Freshservice







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





No.of agents





Phone No.
















Everything you need to take control of your assets





CMDB


Asset Overview


Asset Mapping


















































Everything you need to take control of your assets


CMDB
View all the assets and contracts used by the organization in a single pane, and see details like its type, location, and the person or department using it.



Asset Overview
View all details of an asset’s lifecycle – from acquisition to expiry. Get context about its usage and plan future asset purchases.



Asset Mapping
Visualize dependencies and relationships with asset relationship map view.










Freshservice features to enhance your service delivery




Incident Management
Resolve tickets raised via email, self-service portal, phone, or in person. Track, prioritize, assign, and automate resolution processes to drive efficiency.





Service Catalog
Offer multiple services for various departments with the service catalog so users can place and receive requests in no time.





Knowledge Base
Create solutions for your incidents, automatically convert it to knowledge base articles, and improve productivity by responding to similar requests with canned responses.





Reporting
Identify bottlenecks, make informed decisions, monitor service desk performance, and improve service delivery with predefined and custom reporting capabilities.





Integrations
Make work simpler with popular third-party integrations and customizable plugins so you can manage services from the single window of your Freshservice account.





Gamification
Integrated game mechanics transforms the service desk to a game and makes work fun by motivating agents with rewards for tasks.




Sign up for freeRequest Demo 


The Freshservice impact on our customers
















““If another organization is frustrated with their current ITSM tool and wants a breath of fresh air, then Freshservice is there ready and waiting.””



          Adam Le Feuvre
        
Project Manager
M&C Saatchi



















“We’ve seen infinite improvements in our service desk with Freshservice. Being an evidence-based business, Freshservice helps us drive intelligent decisions by letting us track data.”



          Tom Peach-Geraghty
        
Head of IT Operations
Unidays



















“Freshservice has helped us improve our ability to serve to requests or queries in an elegant and professional manner. The portal experience is very good.”



          Karthikeyan Rammohan
        
Manager of People Operations
Flipkart



















“Veeva's teams are able to resolve issues in less than 4 hours with more visibility into end-users’ issues in Freshservice.”



          Prasad Ramakrishnan
        
Chief Information Officer
Veeva Systems



















“I was surprised at the speed of implementation, Freshservice was available the next day and ready to use in under a week.”



          Craig Bell
        
IT Service Director
Cordant





























Trusted by over 10,000 customers

















































































































Try Freshservice free for 30 days


Sign up with google
or




Please confirm your company and service desk domain ID








First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 































Cloud Service Desk Software  | Freshservice


















































Freshworks















Cloud Service Desk Software
Online IT solution better than On-premise
Seamlessly integrate and store everything on cloud
GET STARTED FOR FREE

 


Something better than On-premise software.. 
Wary of hosting servers and switching between multiple tools in different locations? You need something reliable to provide reliable data and automated workflows. Here is where cloud service desk software has filled a void. More and more enterprises have started opting for cloud based software over on-premise versions.








Why Choose Cloud service desk software over On-Premise

No or limited capital expenditure
Multiple locations with server on the cloud

Easy configuration and customization
Scalable and systematic workflow
Automated service desk
No worries about storage limits





Why you need Freshservice cloud service desk?
Freshservice SaaS helps you save you thousands of dollars which might be going down the drain with your current or almost non-existent help desk. 
Flexible cloud-based ITSM
Embed Freshservice’s one-touch service on your Android or iOS smartphone and use your cloud based service desk on the go. Add as many agents you require; assign tasks, monitor your agents and CI in just a few clicks. Get unlimited storage on the cloud with no hardware restrictions to boggle you down. 
Multichannel & Go mobile
Access and maintain your help desk from anywhere. You can use your SaaS service desk through different portals without any hiccups. You don’t have to rely on hosted servers or different integrations or applications to get your work running. You can even keep your data secure with periodic backups . 
Cost effective
Freshservice is cost effective, simple and efficient to use. You don’t have to invest in hosting, installing, configuration or any kind of infrastructure. Everything is available on the cloud. Save your valuable time and resources when you use Freshservice; eliminate all the unnecessary things your incompetent service desk makes you do.
Know more about Freshservice Service Desk Software


Need more reasons?? Check out Freshservice ITSM Features

IT Trouble Ticketing Software


IT Service Request Management Tool



IT Asset Management Software


IT Financial Management



ITIL Configuration Management


Service Desk Automation





Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds

Try Freshservice Now













Freshservice Integrations | Integrate your ITIL Service Desk with tools you are already using!









































Integrate with other apps you use and love
Freshservice fits right into your existing business ecosystem with integrations available for popular business apps. 
Sign up for free

 



Native Integrations














Atlassian JIRA

Map bugs to tasks and tickets from inside Freshservice

Learn more

















Rescue

Share users' screens instantly, and solve problems in real time

Learn more

















FreshBooks

Track time on tasks and tickets, plus get the option of invoicing

Learn more

















G Suite

Sign into your service desk directly from Google Apps with Single Sign On

Learn more

















Harvest

Time tracking and invoicing options in your service desk

Learn more

















SurveyMonkey

Enhance your customer support with meaningful feedback

Learn more

















Zapier

Easy to bridge the gap between your service desk and different applications

Learn more

















Dropbox

Send large files and attachments easily

Learn more

















Bomgar

Provide remote desktop assistance with screen-sharing and secure web-based live chat support

Learn more

















SCCM

Advanced asset discovery module to sync your inventories with the service desk 

Learn more

















Box

Share large files and documents from your service desk 

Learn more

















Amazon web services

Import virtual assets right from cloud storage EC2, RDS and EBS directly to your CMDB

Learn more

















Pagerduty

Incident management system to monitor, schedule and create alerts for all your tickets

Learn more

















Cloudwatch

Convert AWS CloudWatch alarms to tickets and alarm notifications to ticket notes

Learn more

















Quickbooks

Send time spent on tickets to QuickBooks for easy billing

Learn more

















ClearGraph

Interactive real-time reports with custom dashboards

Learn more

















DocuSign

Send contracts for online e-signature and approval from your service desk

Learn more

















Slack

Get alerts and resolve issues right from Slack channels

Learn more

















Office 365

Schedule and sync Freshservice events to your Office 365 Calendar

Learn more

















Salesforce

Import your Salesforce contact information straight into Freshservice

Learn more

















Yammer

Automatically convert your Yammer newsfeed into tickets within your service desk

Learn more

















WorkflowMax

Log time spent on your Freshservice tickets in your WorkflowMax jobs and tasks

Learn more

















Workday

Easily enter new data and create service requests to onboard new employees

Learn more









Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds
Start your 30-day free trial. No credit card required. No strings attached. 
Sign up for free

 
























Freshservice Pricing Plans | Enterprise ITSM Solution at $0









































Refreshing service management at $0
Enjoy free 30-day Estate trial and free forever on Sprout 




MONTHLY



Save upto 20%

YEARLY







SPROUT
For getting started




                    FREE
                


                      up to 3 agents and 100 assets
                    




100 End UsersIncident ManagementSelf-service PortalKnowledge BaseAsset ManagementAD Integration 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






BLOSSOM
Perfect for small teams




$
29



                      /agent/month billed
                        yearly
monthly



                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Sprout and…

Unlimited End UsersStandard ReportsMultiple Help Desk EmailsCustom Domain MappingTime Tracking  




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details








GARDEN
Ideal for growing teams




$
49



                      /agent/month billed
                        yearly
monthly



                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Blossom and…

Change, Problem, & Release ManagementMultiple SLAsPriority MatrixScheduled ReportsCustom Roles 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






ESTATE
Best value for large teams




$
79



                      /agent/month billed
                        yearly
monthly



                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Garden and…

Service CatalogEnterprise ReportsProject ManagementEnterprise Security - Custom SSL & Trusted IPContract Management 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details









24 x 7 email support and 24 x 5 phone support included with all plans
Can’t decide which plan is right for you? 
See our complete feature comparison












Day Passes
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Need extra support help for a product launch or other spike? Day Passes make it easy for you to add extra agents temporarily when you need them. Just add them as occasional agents, buy a few Day Passes, and let them use a day pass for each day they need to access your support.
Read more 









Frequently Asked Questions

How does the 30-day free trial work?After you sign up, you get free unrestricted access to all the features available in Freshservice for 30 days. Thereafter, you can upgrade to a suitable plan.Is my data safe?We take security seriously. Our servers are hosted in a world class data center that is protected by biometric locks and 24-hour surveillance. We ensure that our application is always up to date with the latest security patches. Our data center is EU-US privacy shield compliant and all Freshservice plans include SSL encryption to keep your data safe.Do you have any contracts or cancellation fees?No. We do not have contracts or cancellation fees. You can cancel whenever you want and you will only be billed for that particular month.What types of payment do you accept?We accept Visa, Mastercard, Discover, American Express, and also PayPal. For annual contracts, we accept checks and online transfers in USD, EUR, GBP currencies.Can I upgrade or downgrade anytime?Yes. Freshservice offers a pay-as-you-go service, and you can upgrade, downgrade or cancel at any time. To change your plan, visit 'Plans & Billing' in your Freshservice account.Do you offer any discounts?Yes. Freshservice offers discounts to non-profit organizations, educational institutions and large teams. Contact support@freshservice.com for personalized pricing. Who is an agent? Can I add an agent on short term basis?In Freshservice, an agent can either be full-time or occasional, depending on your requirement. A full-time agent is someone who is part of your core service desk team. An occasional agent is someone who requires access to the service desk only on need-to basis. By default, Freshservice offers 3 free Day Passes at the time of sign up. For adding more occasional agents, you can purchase Day Passes starting from $1. Anybody can be added as an occasional agent, and the admin can define their role and scope of access to the service desk portal.Can I buy features as add-ons? Only some features are available for purchase as add-ons at the moment. Contact support@freshservice.com about customized plans. Have any other questions?If you have questions about Freshservice or the sign up process, please email us at support@freshservice.com and we will be glad to answer all your questions. 






Get Freshservice for iOS and Android
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Freshservice's mobile apps have been thoughtfully designed to help your team stay in touch with users, even when they're not at their desks. With the iOS and Android apps, your team can stay on top of incoming tickets, collaborate with other agents, and respond to issues on the go.



































